dictionaries/uk/index.dic
адмініструвати/XytN
алергізувати/Xyt
антикомутувати/Xyt
асфальтувати/XytN
балотувати/XytN
безчестити/XyJ
близитися/Xy
бортникувати/Xyt
брьохнути/X
бучити/Xy
ватувати/X
ввіпхнутися/X
вгодити/XL
вдоволити/XLN
верстуватися/Xyt
взаємопов'язати/X'
виблюнути/Xl
вибучувати/Xyt'
вивішувати/Xyt'
вигнічувати/Xyt
вигребти/XN
видозмінюватися/Xyt
визволити/XLJN
виквашувати/XytN
виконуватися/Xyt
викруглити/XNL
вилітувати/X
вимальовувати/Xyt'
вимолочувати/Xyt'
виніжуватися/Xyt
випірнути/X
випорожнити/XLN
випростуватися/Xyt
вирнути/X
виселити/XLN
вислужувати/Xyt
виставитися/XJ
висунутися/XJ
виткнути/Xl
витримуватися/Xyt
вихарчуватися/X
вихрещувати/Xyt'
вичинювати/Xyt
вишліхтовувати/Xyt
вияснитися/XL
відв'язатися/X
відволокти/XN
відгукуватися/Xyt
відітнутися/X
відлаюватися/Xyt
відновлювати/Xyt'
відпрохувати/Xyt
відскочити/XJ
відтісувати/Xyt
відчепіритися/X
віньєтувати/XytN
влагоджуватися/Xyt
вмудрувати/X
впізнаватися/Xyt
врізноманітнитися/X
встелитися/X
втрамбуватися/X
вщемити/XL
гепнути/X
голосувати/XytN
грякнутися/X
деімперіалізуватися/Xyt
департизувати/XytN
дибитися/Xyt
добудовувати/Xyt'
догукнути/X
докреслити/XJLN
домуровувати/Xyt
дополоти/XlN
дослухуватися/Xyt
доупорядковуватися/Xyt
дряпнути/Xl
етилуватися/Xyt
заармовуватися/Xyt
забронювати/XN
завилювати/Xy
загвинчуватися/Xyt
загребнути/X
задовжуватися/Xyt
заінтересувати/XN
заклуботати/X
закрасити/XNL
залементуватися/X
замахнутися/X
замуркотати/X
запаралелити/XJN
заповнитися/XL
запушувати/Xyt
засвідчуватися/Xyt
засмачити/XN
застосуватися/X
затиньковуватися/Xyt
затупцюватися/X
заховувати/Xyt'
зачіплювати/Xyt'
заштопувати/Xyt'
збіднити/XN
звершуватися/Xyt
зговорювати/Xyt
здисциплінувати/XN
зінтерпретувати/XN
злузувати/Xyt
змогтися/X
знекиснювати/Xyt
знічуватися/Xyt
зрідитися/XL
зчленувати/XN
інтеріоризувати/XytN
карамелізувати/XNyt
клубочитися/Xyt
конденсуватися/Xyt
костюмувати/XytN
купажувати/Xyt
лідерувати/Xyt
максималізуватися/Xyt
метнути/X
морити/XytLN
набундючитися/XJ
наглянсовувати/Xyt
наділити/XLN
нажаблюватися/Xyt
накопичуватися/Xyt
налучити/XJ
наноситися/XJytL
напридумувати/X'
насинювати/Xyt'
настромити/XLN
нафаршировувати/Xyt
наштамповувати/Xyt
недораховувати/Xyt
об'єднувати/Xyt'
обгумувати/XN
облагородити/XJN
обмокнути/XlZ
обрости/X
обтулити/XNL
одгнисти/X
озонуватися/Xyt
оперіщити/XJ
орнаментуватися/Xyt
осушити/XLN
ошукувати/Xyt'
переадресуватися/X
перевитратити/XN
перегромаджуватися/Xyt
перезапустити/XLN
перекомплектовувати/Xyt
перелічуватися/Xyt
перемочувати/Xyt'
переорієнтувати/XN
переполіскуватися/Xyt
перерозташувати/XN
перестрибувати/Xyt
переукомплектувати/XN
перештемпелюватися/X
підвечіркувати/Xyt
підкиснути/XZ
підлужити/XN
підпороти/Xl
підсмикувати/Xyt
підфарбовуватися/Xyt
плюскотіти/Xyt
повгодовуватися/X
повиригувати/X
повідчіплюватися/X
поголосити/X
подорожити/X
позаздритися/X
позатрушувати/X'
позубити/XN
покошмарити/X
полоснути/Xl
помпувати/Xyt
понанизувати/X'
пообгодовувати/X
поорудувати/X
попереточувати/X'
поплужити/X
попорядкувати/XN
попробувати/X
порозгвинчуватися/X
порозхлюпуватися/X
поскребти/X
поститися/XytL
поточуватися/Xyt
похитувати/Xyt'
пошеретувати/XN
прибудувати/XN
пригрозити/XL
прикусити/XLN
примощувати/Xyt'
припрасовувати/Xyt
приспівувати/Xyt'
приточитися/XL
прищулювати/Xyt'
провіяти/X'
продержатися/XJ
проказуватися/Xyt
пролигнути/X
пронизати/X'
проричати/X
просочувати/Xyt
проткнутися/X
прочавлювати/Xyt
пшикнути/X
рекапіталізуватися/Xyt
різати/Xyt'
розвалитися/XL
розгостюватися/X
розжувати/XN
розкомплектуватися/X
розласуватися/X
розмічувати/Xyt
розпіарити/XJN
розраювати/Xyt
розстебнути/XNl
розтурбуватися/X
розчленувати/XN
салютувати/Xyt
саморуйнуватися/Xyt
симпатизувати/Xyt
склеювати/Xyt'
скраситися/XL
смиконутися/X
спилювати/Xyt
сполітизуватися/X
спродаватися/Xyt
стикуватися/Xyt
строюджувати/Xyt
сфокусовувати/Xyt
тверезити/Xyt
токотіти/Xyt
тріпотатися/Xyt
уварити/XLN
угукнути/X
укипіти/X
ум'яти/Xl
упакуватися/X
уражувати/Xyt
услухуватися/X
утілити/XJN
учительствувати/Xyt
фланірувати/Xyt
хвиснути/X
цвиркнути/X
чергувати/Xyt
шибонути/X
шуткувати/Xyt
